Utah statutes.
77-38-202.   Purpose.

It is the purpose of this act to enhance and promote the mental, physical and emotional recovery of victims of sexual assault and to protect the information given by victims to sexual assault counselors from being disclosed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

